Utah statutes.
63M-1-605.   Duties and powers.

(1)  The council shall:

(a)  encourage the use of science and technology in the administration of state and local government;

(b)  develop programs whereby state agencies and the several public and private institutions of higher education and technical colleges within the state may assist business and industry in the utilization of science and technology;

(c)  further communication between agencies of federal, state, and local government who wish to utilize science and technology;

(d)  develop programs of cooperation on matters of science and technology between:

(i)  state and local government agencies;

(ii)  the several public and private institutions of higher education and technical colleges within the state; and

(iii)  business and industry within the state; or

(iv) any combination of these;

(e)  provide a means whereby government, business, industry, and higher education may be represented in the formulation and implementation of state policies and programs on matters of science and technology;

(f)  review, catalog, and compile the research and development uses by the state universities of the revenue derived from mineral lease funds on state and federal lands;

(g) submit, before November 1, an annual written report to the Legislature on the expenditure and utilization of these mineral lease funds;

(h)  make recommendations to the Legislature on the further uses of these mineral lease funds in order to stimulate research and development directed toward the more effective utilization of the state's natural resources; and

(i)  prepare and submit, before November 1, an annual written report to the governor and the Legislature.

(2)  The council may:

(a)  in accordance with Title 63J, Chapter 5, Federal Funds Procedures Act, apply for, receive, and disburse funds, contributions, or grants from whatever source for the purposes set forth in this part;

(b)  employ, compensate, and prescribe the duties and powers of those individuals, subject to the provisions of this part relating to the adviser, necessary to execute the duties and powers of the council; and

(c)  enter into contracts for the purposes of this part.



Amended by Chapter 255, 2013 General Session

